Maine, session 132, LD1729.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §685, sub-§2, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 398, Pt. PPPP, §3,
is amended to read:
D. For property tax years beginning on April 1, 2022, 73% of the taxes lost by reason
of the exemptions under section 683, subsections 1 and 1‑B; and
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §685, sub-§2, ¶E, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. II, §1, is
further amended to read:
E. For property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2023, April 1, 2024 and April
1, 2025, 76% of the taxes lost by reason of the exemptions under section 683,
subsections 1 and 1‑B.; and
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §685, sub-§2, ¶F is enacted to read:
F. For property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2026, the percentage of the
taxes lost by reason of the exemptions under section 683, subsections 1 and 1-B that is
3 percentage points higher than the percentage reimbursed to the municipality in the
year immediately prior. The annual increase in reimbursement must continue until the
percentage of reimbursement to the municipality reaches 100% of the taxes lost by
reason of the exemptions under section 683, subsections 1 and 1-B.